Mississippi, session 2026, SB2716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 93-21-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-21-3.  As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Abuse" means the occurrence of one or more of the following acts between spouses, former spouses, persons living as spouses or who formerly lived as spouses, persons having a child or children in common, other individuals related by consanguinity or affinity who reside together or who formerly resided together or between individuals who have a current or former dating relationship: (i)  Attempting to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury or serious bodily injury with or without a deadly weapon; (ii)  Placing, by physical menace, emotional intimidation, or threat, another in fear of imminent serious bodily injury; (iii)  Criminal sexual conduct committed against a minor within the meaning of Section 97-5-23; (iv)  Stalking within the meaning of Section 97-3-107; (v)  Cyberstalking within the meaning of Section 97-45-15; or (vi)  Sexual offenses within the meaning of Section 97-3-65 or 97-3-95. "Abuse" does not include any act of self-defense. (b)  "Adult" means any person eighteen (18) years of age or older, or any person under eighteen (18) years of age who has been emancipated by marriage. (c)  "Court" means the chancery court, justice court, municipal court or county court. (d)  "Dating relationship" means a social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature between two (2) individuals; it does not include a casual relationship or ordinary fraternization between two (2) individuals in a business or social context.  Whether a relationship is a "dating relationship" shall be determined by examining the following factors: (i)  The length of the relationship; (ii)  The type of relationship; and (iii)  The frequency of interaction between the two (2) individuals involved in the relationship. (e)  "Mutual protection order" means a protection order that includes provisions in favor of both the individual seeking relief and the respondent. SECTION 2.  Section 93-21-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-21-7.  (1)  Any person may seek a domestic abuse protection order for himself by filing a petition alleging abuse by the respondent.  Any parent, adult household member, or next friend of the abused person may seek a domestic abuse protection order on behalf of any minor children or any person alleged to be incompetent by filing a petition with the court alleging abuse by the respondent.  Cases seeking relief under this chapter shall be priority cases on the court's docket and the judge shall be immediately notified when a case is filed in order to provide for expedited proceedings. (2)  A petition seeking a domestic abuse protection order may be filed in any of the following courts: municipal, justice, county or chancery, or a state military court as defined in Section 33-13-151.  A chancery court shall not prohibit the filing of a petition which does not seek emergency relief on the basis that the petitioner did not first seek or obtain temporary relief in another court.  A petition requesting emergency relief pending a hearing * * * shall not may be filed in chancery court * * * unless specifically permitted by the chancellor under the circumstances or as a separate pleading in an ongoing chancery action between the parties.  The chancery court, where the petition is filed, shall have full jurisdiction to consider and issue emergency relief under this chapter.  Nothing in this section shall: (a)  Be construed to require consideration of emergency relief by a chancery court; or (b)  Preclude a chancery court from entering an order of emergency relief. (3)  The petitioner in any action brought pursuant to this chapter shall not bear the costs associated with its filing or the costs associated with the issuance or service of any notice of a hearing to the respondent, issuance or service of an order of protection on the respondent, or issuance or service of a warrant or witness subpoena.  If the court finds that the petitioner is entitled to an order protecting the petitioner from abuse, the court shall be authorized to assess all costs including attorney's fees of the proceedings to the respondent.  The court may assess costs including attorney's fees to the petitioner only if the allegations of abuse are determined to be without merit and the court finds that the petitioner is not a victim of abuse as defined by Section 93-21-3. SECTION 3.  Section 93-21-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-21-11.  (1)  Within ten (10) days of the filing of a petition under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall hold a hearing, at which time the petitioner must prove the allegation of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence. (2)  The respondent shall be given notice of the filing of any petition and of the date, time and place set for the hearing by personal service of process.  A court may conduct a hearing in the absence of the respondent after first ascertaining that the respondent was properly noticed of the hearing date, time and place. (3)  (a)  All emergency, temporary, and final domestic abuse protection orders issued under this chapter shall be served upon the respondent by: (i)  Personal service by a sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, or certified process server; or (ii)  Any alternate method of service authorized under this subsection, when approved by the issuing court. (b)  The sheriff of the county in which the respondent resides or may be found shall treat service of domestic abuse protection orders as a priority duty.  The sheriff shall attempt service as soon as practicable, but no later than twenty-four (24) hours after receiving the order for service. (c)  If the respondent cannot be located after three (3) diligent attempts at personal service, the issuing court may authorize alternate or substituted service, including: (i)  Leaving a copy of the order at the respondent's usual place of abode with a person of suitable age who is at least eighteen (18) years old; (ii)  Service by certified mail, return receipt requested; or (iii)  Any other method reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the respondent, as approved by the court. Service completed under this paragraph shall be deemed valid for enforcement. (d)  The officer or person serving the order shall promptly file with the issuing court a return of service stating the date, time, and method of service.  The clerk shall ensure that service information is entered into the Mississippi Protection Order Registry without delay. (e)  A copy of the issued protection order shall be electronically transmitted to the sheriff of the county where service is to occur and to any other law-enforcement agency identified in the order.  Electronic transmission satisfies the requirement of delivery to law enforcement for enforcement purposes. (f)  Failure to complete service does not affect the validity of the protection order; however, the order shall not be enforceable against the respondent until personal service or court-approved alternate service has been completed. SECTION 4.  Section 93-21-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-21-15.  (1)  (a)  After a hearing is held as provided in Section 93-21-11 for which notice and opportunity to be heard has been granted to the respondent, and upon a finding that the petitioner has proved the existence of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence, the municipal * * * and, justice, chancery or county courts shall be empowered to grant a temporary domestic abuse protection order to bring about a cessation of abuse of the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent.  The relief the court may provide includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i)  Directing the respondent to refrain from abusing the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent; (ii)  Prohibiting or limiting respondent's physical proximity to the abused or other household members as designated by the court, including residence and place of work; (iii)  Prohibiting or limiting contact by the respondent with the abused or other household members designated by the court, whether in person, by telephone or by other electronic communication; (iv)  Granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both; or (v)  Prohibiting the transferring, encumbering or otherwise disposing of property mutually owned or leased by the parties, except when in the ordinary course of business. (b)  The duration of any temporary domestic abuse protection order issued by a municipal or justice court shall not exceed thirty (30) days.  However, if the party to be protected and the respondent do not have minor children in common, the duration of the temporary domestic abuse protection order may exceed thirty (30) days but shall not exceed one (1) year. (c)  Procedures for an appeal of the issuance of a temporary domestic abuse protection order are set forth in Section 93-21-15.1. (2)  (a)  After a hearing is held as provided in Section 93-21-11 for which notice and opportunity to be heard has been granted to the respondent, and upon a finding that the petitioner has proved the existence of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence, the chancery or county court shall be empowered to grant a final domestic abuse protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent.  In granting a final domestic abuse protection order, the chancery or county court may provide for relief that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i)  Directing the respondent to refrain from abusing the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent; (ii)  Granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both; (iii)  When the respondent has a duty to support the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent living in the residence or household and the respondent is the sole owner or lessee, granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both, or by consent agreement allowing the respondent to provide suitable, alternate housing; (iv)  Awarding temporary custody of or establishing temporary visitation rights with regard to any minor children or any person alleged to be incompetent, or both; (v)  If the respondent is legally obligated to support the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent, ordering the respondent to pay temporary support for the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent; (vi)  Ordering the respondent to pay to the abused person monetary compensation for losses suffered as a direct result of the abuse, including, but not limited to, medical expenses resulting from such abuse, loss of earnings or support, out-of-pocket losses for injuries sustained, moving expenses, a reasonable attorney's fee, or any combination of the above; (vii)  Prohibiting the transferring, encumbering, or otherwise disposing of property mutually owned or leased by the parties, except when in the ordinary course of business; (viii)  Prohibiting or limiting respondent's physical proximity to the abused or other household members designated by the court, including residence, school and place of work; (ix) Prohibiting or limiting contact by the respondent with the abused or other household members designated by the court whether in person, by telephone or by electronic communication; and (x)  Ordering counseling or professional medical treatment for the respondent, including counseling or treatment designed to bring about the cessation of domestic abuse. (b)  Except as provided below, a final domestic abuse protection order issued by a chancery or county court under the provisions of this chapter shall be effective for such time period as the court deems appropriate.  The expiration date of the order shall be clearly stated in the order. (c)  Temporary provisions addressing temporary custody, visitation or support of minor children contained in a final domestic abuse protection order issued by a chancery or county court shall be effective for one hundred eighty (180) days. A party seeking relief beyond that period must initiate appropriate proceedings in the chancery court of appropriate jurisdiction.  If at the end of the one-hundred-eighty-day period, neither party has initiated such proceedings, the custody, visitation or support of minor children will revert to the chancery court order addressing such terms that was in effect at the time the domestic abuse protection order was granted.  The chancery court in which custody, visitation or support proceedings have been initiated may provide for any temporary provisions addressing custody, visitation or support as the court deems appropriate. (3)  Every domestic abuse protection order issued pursuant to this section shall set forth the reasons for its issuance, shall contain specific findings of fact regarding the existence of abuse, shall be specific in its terms and shall describe in reasonable detail the act or acts to be prohibited.  No mutual protection order shall be issued unless that order is supported by an independent petition by each party requesting relief pursuant to this chapter, and the order contains specific findings of fact regarding the existence of abuse by each party as principal aggressor, and a finding that neither party acted in self-defense. (4)  The Attorney General, in cooperation with the Mississippi Supreme Court and the Mississippi Judicial College, shall develop standardized forms for temporary and final domestic abuse protection orders.  The use of standardized forms in protection order proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall be fully implemented by all courts no later than July 1, 2015.  However, in any criminal prosecution or contempt proceeding for a violation of a domestic abuse protection order, it shall not be a defense that the order was not issued on the standardized form. (5)  Upon issuance of any protection order by the court, the order shall be entered in the Mississippi Protection Order Registry by the clerk of the court pursuant to Section 93-21-25, and a copy shall be provided to the sheriff's department in the county of the court of issuance. (6)  Upon subsequent petition by either party and following a hearing of which both parties have received notice and an opportunity to be heard, the court may modify, amend, or dissolve a domestic abuse protection order previously issued by that court. (7)  A domestic abuse protection order issued under this section is effective in this state, in all other states, and in United States territories and tribal lands.  A court shall not limit the scope of a protection order to the boundaries of the State of Mississippi or to the boundaries of a municipality or county within the State of Mississippi. (8)  Procedures for an appeal of the issuance or denial of a final domestic abuse protection order are set forth in Section 93-21-15.1. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.